New York, session 2025-2026, S2654.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 210-B of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 61 to read as follows: 3 61. Credit for small businesses that sell New York state produced 4 products. (a) A small business shall be allowed a credit against the tax 5 imposed by this article if such small business sells a certain percent- 6 age of qualified products. Such credit shall be computed according to 7 the following schedule: 8 (i) Credit of one thousand dollars when five to nine percent of a 9 qualifying small business' total sales are attributed to the sale of 10 qualifying products. 11 (ii) Credit of two thousand dollars when ten to twenty-four percent of 12 a qualifying small business' total sales are attributed to the sale of 13 qualifying products. 14 (iii) Credit of five thousand dollars when twenty-five percent or more 15 of a qualifying small business' total sales are attributed to the sale 16 of qualifying products. 17 (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term: 18 (i) "Small business" shall mean a business which is an independently 19 or privately-owned cafe, restaurant, eatery, bar, pub, brewery, distil- 20 lery, orchard, food truck, retail store, farm stand, hotel, or motel. 21 (ii) "Qualified product" shall mean a product which is grown, brewed 22 or distilled in New York state and such products shall include: 23 (A) beer, wine, spirits, and ciders; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03715-01-5 S. 2654 2 1 (B) agricultural ingredients, including but not limited to wheat, 2 barley, hops, apples, pumpkins, corn, cabbage, berries, soybeans, maple, 3 or any item used for menu items; 4 (C) dairy products, including but not limited to milk, cream, butter, 5 and cheese; or 6 (D) meat products, including but not limited to beef, chicken, and 7 pork. 8 (c) The credit allowed under this subdivision for the taxable year 9 shall not reduce the tax due for such year to less than the amount 10 prescribed in paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section two hundred 11 ten of this article. However, if the amount of credit allowed under this 12 subdivision for the taxable year reduces the tax to such amount or if 13 the taxpayer otherwise pays tax based on the fixed dollar minimum 14 amount, any amount of credit thus not deductible in such taxable year 15 shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be credited or refunded in 16 accordance with the provisions of section one thousand eighty-six of 17 this chapter. Provided, however, the provisions of subsection (c) of 18 section one thousand eighty-eight of this chapter notwithstanding, no 19 interest shall be paid thereon. 20 § 2. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 21 (qqq) to read as follows: 22 (qqq) Credit for small businesses that sell New York state produced 23 products. (1) A small business shall be allowed a credit against the tax 24 imposed by this article if such small business sells a certain percent- 25 age of qualified products. Such credit shall be computed according to 26 the following schedule: 27 (A) Credit of one thousand dollars when five to nine percent of a 28 qualifying small business' total sales are attributed to the sale of 29 qualifying products. 30 (B) Credit of two thousand dollars when ten to twenty-four percent of 31 a qualifying small business' total sales are attributed to the sale of 32 qualifying products. 33 (C) Credit of five thousand dollars when twenty-five percent or more 34 of a qualifying small business' total sales are attributed to the sale 35 of qualifying products. 36 (2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term: 37 (A) "Small business" shall mean a business which is an independently 38 or privately-owned cafe, restaurant, eatery, bar, pub, brewery, distil- 39 lery, orchard, food truck, retail store, farm stand, hotel, or motel. 40 (B) "Qualified product" shall mean a product which is grown, brewed or 41 distilled in New York state and such products shall include: 42 (i) beer, wine, spirits, and ciders; 43 (ii) agricultural ingredients, including but not limited to wheat, 44 barley, hops, apples, pumpkins, corn, cabbage, berries, soybeans, maple, 45 or any item used for menu items; 46 (iii) dairy products, including but not limited to milk, cream, 47 butter, and cheese; or 48 (iv) meat products, including but not limited to beef, chicken, and 49 pork. 50 (3) If the amount of the credit allowed under this subsection for any 51 taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the excess 52 shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be credited or refunded in 53 accordance with the provisions of section six hundred eighty-six of this 54 article, provided, however, that no interest shall be paid thereon. S. 2654 3 1 § 3. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection (i) of section 606 2 of the tax law is amended by adding a new clause (lii) to read as 3 follows: 4 (lii) Credit for small businesses Amount of credit under 5 that sell New York state produced subdivision sixty-one of 6 products under subsection (qqq) section two hundred ten-B 7 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 8 years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.